Illinois, session 104th, HB4196.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by adding Section 580-85 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/80-85 new)7    Sec. 80-85. Approval of township credit card statements. 8If a township has been issued a credit card, then, each month, 9the township board shall vote to verify the validity of an 10itemized statement of all purchases made using the credit in 11the preceding month. The itemized statement must include all 12purchases made using the credit card in the preceding month 13and may not be redacted in a manner inconsistent with the 14Freedom of Information Act. The vote shall solely be for the 15approval of the itemized statement of all purchases made using 16the credit card and shall not include any other expense 17approval. 18    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 19adding Section 8-1-19 as follows: 20    (65 ILCS 5/8-1-19 new)21    Sec. 8-1-19. Approval of municipal credit card statements.   HB4196 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 15665 RTM 28837 b1If a municipality has been issued a credit card, then, each 2month, the corporate authorities of the municipality shall 3vote to verify the validity of an itemized statement of all 4purchases made using the credit card in the preceding month. 5The itemized statement must include all purchases made using 6the credit card in the preceding month and may not be redacted 7in a manner inconsistent with the Freedom of Information Act. 8The vote shall solely be for the approval of the itemized 9statement of all purchases made using the credit card and 10shall not include any other expense approval. 11    Section 15. The Park District Code is amended by adding 12Section 4-10 as follows: 13    (70 ILCS 1205/4-10 new)14    Sec. 4-10. Approval of park district credit card 15statements. If a park district has been issued a credit card, 16then, each month, the board of the park district shall vote to 17verify the validity of an itemized statement of all purchases 18made using the credit card in the preceding month. The 19itemized statement must include all purchases made using the 20credit card in the preceding month and may not be redacted in a 21manner inconsistent with the Freedom of Information Act. The 22vote shall solely be for the approval of the itemized 23statement of all purchases made using the credit card and 24shall not include any other expense approval.   HB4196 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 15665 RTM 28837 b1    Section 20. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 210-31 and 34-240 as follows: 3    (105 ILCS 5/10-31 new)4    Sec. 10-31. Approval of school district credit card 5statements. If the district has been issued a credit card, 6then, each month, the board shall vote to verify the validity 7of an itemized statement of all purchases made using the 8credit card in the preceding month. The itemized statement 9must include all purchases made using the credit card in the 10preceding month and may not be redacted in a manner 11inconsistent with the Freedom of Information Act. The vote 12shall solely be for the approval of the itemized statement of 13all purchases made using the credit card and shall not include 14any other expense approval. 15    (105 ILCS 5/34-240 new)16    Sec. 34-240. Approval of school district credit card 17statements. If the district has been issued a credit card, 18then, each month, the board shall vote to verify the validity 19of an itemized statement of all purchases made using the 20credit card in the preceding month. The itemized statement 21must include all purchases made using the credit card in the 22preceding month and may not be redacted in a manner 23inconsistent with the Freedom of Information Act. The vote   HB4196 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 15665 RTM 28837 b1shall solely be for the approval of the itemized statement of 2all purchases made using the credit card and shall not include 3any other expense approval. 4    Section 25. The Public Community College Act is amended by 5adding Section 3-85 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 805/3-85 new)7    Sec. 3-85. Approval of community college credit card 8statements. If a community college district has been issued a 9credit card, then, each month, the board shall vote to verify 10the validity of an itemized statement of all purchases made 11using the credit card in the preceding month. The itemized 12statement must include all purchases made using the credit 13card in the preceding month and may not be redacted in a manner 14inconsistent with the Freedom of Information Act. The vote 15shall solely be for the approval of the itemized statement of 16all purchases made using the credit card and shall not include 17any other expense approval.